North Carolina, session 2025, HB1198.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Article 9A of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 90-171.38A. Sexual assault nurse examiners data collection.
On October 1 of each year, programs approved by the Board under G.S. 90-171.38 to train,
educate, and credential sexual assault nurse examiners shall annually report to the Board
information on all graduates from each program. This report shall include the number of total
graduates, the county of employment of each graduate, and, if known, where each graduate plans
to work or is employed."
SECTION 1.(b) Article 9A of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 90-171.43B. Nurse information database.
(a) All active licensees under this Article shall register with the Board their respective
training and education credentials and the location and business entity with which they practice.
Each active licensee shall update training and educational credentials, if necessary, when the
active licensee renews their license with the Board. Any location and business entity changes
shall be submitted to the Board within 30 business days of the change. Inactive licensees are not
subject to this section.
(b) The Board shall develop and maintain a database accessible to the Board with all of
the information required by this section."
SECTION 2. All active licensees under the North Carolina Board of Nursing shall
submit the information required under G.S. 90-171.43B, as enacted by this act, within one
calendar year of this act becoming law.
SECTION 3. The North Carolina Board of Nursing may adopt rules to implement
the provisions of this act.
SECTION 4. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services the nonrecurring sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to assist the North Carolina Board of Nursing in implementing the data
collection required under G.S. 90-171.38A, as enacted by this act.
*H1198-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 5. Section 4 of this act becomes effective July 1, 2026. The remainder of
this act becomes effective October 1, 2026.
Page 2 House Bill 1198-First Edition